Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.66
Emergency operations; immunity from liability for licensors of shelter space.

Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily and without compensation grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of such real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons during an actual, impending, mock or practice attack or disaster shall, together with his successors in interest, if any, not be civilly liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to, any person on or about such real estate or premises, or loss of, or damage to, the property of such person, at any time such real estate or premises are actually used for such purpose.

Laws 1963, c. 499, § 1, p. 1591;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.35;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 31.